North Carolina, session 2025, HB1045.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Fair Wages in
Health Care Act."
SECTION 1.(b) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) North Carolina relies on home care aides, direct support professionals,
certified nursing assistants, psychiatric aides, and licensed practical nurses to
deliver essential daily care for older adults, people with disabilities, and
individuals receiving behavioral health services.
(2) These occupations provide hands-on, safety-critical services that protect the
health and welfare of vulnerable residents and support the continuity of care
in home, community, and facility settings.
(3) Persistent workforce shortages and high turnover in these occupations
jeopardize access to care, increase avoidable hospitalizations and
institutionalization risk, and strain families, providers, and public systems.
(4) Compensation is a material driver of recruitment and retention in these
occupations; establishing clear, statewide minimum wage floors for specified
direct care roles promotes workforce stability and continuity of care.
*H1045-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(5) A stable, adequately compensated direct care workforce advances the public
interest by strengthening public health and safety, supporting individuals'
ability to remain in the least restrictive setting appropriate, and improving the
reliability of services across the State.
SECTION 1.(c) It is the purpose of this act to establish occupational minimum wages
for specified direct care and health care support occupations in order to improve recruitment and
retention, reduce turnover, and protect the health, safety, and welfare of North Carolina residents
who depend on these services.
SECTION 2. Article 2A of Chapter 95 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 95-25.3B. Minimum wage for certain direct care occupations.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Certified Nursing Assistant (CNA). – An individual listed on the Nurse Aide
I Registry or Nurse Aide II Registry maintained under State law.
(2) Direct support professional (DSP). – An employee whose primary job duties
consist of providing direct, hands-on assistance, supervision, habilitation, or
support services to an individual with an intellectual or developmental
disability in a home- or community-based setting, including under a Medicaid
waiver, regardless of job title.
(3) Home care aide. – An employee whose primary job duties consist of providing
in-home personal care services, assistance with activities of daily living, or
home management services to an individual in the individual's residence,
regardless of job title.
(4) Licensed Practical Nurse (LPN). – An individual licensed to practice as a
licensed practical nurse under Article 9A of Chapter 90 of the General
Statutes.
(5) Psychiatric aide or technician (psych aide). – An employee whose primary job
duties consist of providing direct, hands-on care, supervision, safety
monitoring, or behavioral support to individuals receiving psychiatric or
mental health services in a 24-hour facility or inpatient setting, regardless of
job title.
(b) Occupational Minimum Wages. – Notwithstanding G.S. 95-25.3, every employer
shall pay to each employee who performs work in any of the occupations listed below wages of
at least the following amounts per hour:
(1) Home care aide – eighteen dollars ($18.00).
(2) Direct support professional – eighteen dollars ($18.00).
(3) Certified Nursing Assistant – twenty dollars ($20.00).
(4) Psychiatric aide – twenty-two dollars ($22.00).
(5) Licensed Practical Nurse – twenty-four dollars ($24.00).
(c) Construction; Greater Protections Apply. – Nothing in this section shall be construed
to reduce any employee's rights under federal law, under G.S. 95-25.3, or under any employer
policy or contract providing a higher wage. The applicable minimum wage shall be the highest
rate required by this section, G.S. 95-25.3, or federal law.
(d) No Waiver by Designation. – An employer shall not avoid the requirements of this
section by assigning a different job title to an employee whose primary job duties meet the
definitions in subsection (a) of this section. If an employee performs the duties of a covered
occupation for twenty-five percent (25%) or more of hours worked in a workweek, the minimum
wage applicable to that occupation shall apply for that workweek, and if multiple covered
occupations apply, the highest applicable minimum wage shall apply.
(e) Enforcement. – The provisions of this Article applicable to enforcement, remedies,
and retaliation apply to this section."
Page 2 House Bill 1045-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.(a) Implementation for Publicly Funded Health and Human Services
Programs; Contract Adjustments/Medicaid and Waiver Rate Alignment. – The Department of
Health and Human Services shall take all actions necessary to implement the minimum wage
requirements established in this act for services financed in whole or in part with State or federal
funds administered by the Department, including Medicaid and State-funded or federally
authorized waiver programs. These actions shall include, as applicable:
(1) Submitting State Plan Amendments, waiver amendments, and other requests
to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and seeking any approvals
necessary to permit payment methodologies that support the minimum wage
requirements of this act.
(2) Reviewing and, as authorized by law and subject to the availability of
appropriations, adjusting provider reimbursement rates and capitation rate
components to account for demonstrated increases in labor costs necessary to
comply with this act, including costs associated with direct care and support
workers covered by this act.
(3) Revising contract requirements for managed care organizations, prepaid
health plans, local management entities/managed care organizations, and
other contractors administering services financed with
Department-administered funds to ensure that contracted providers have a
feasible path to comply with this act.
SECTION 3.(b) State Procurement and Contract Rate Adjustments. – Each State
agency that procures or funds services in which covered employees provide care or support
funded in whole or in part by State funds shall, to the extent authorized by law and subject to
appropriations, adjust contract rates, reimbursement schedules, or other payment terms as
necessary to avoid undermining compliance with the minimum wage requirements of this act.
SECTION 3.(c) Implementation Plan and Reporting. – No later than October 1,
2027, the Department shall submit an implementation plan to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Medicaid, and the Fiscal Research Division that identifies (i) the programs and services affected,
(ii) the State Plan Amendments, waiver amendments, or approvals needed, (iii) anticipated rate
or contract adjustments, and (iv) any legislative changes necessary to effectuate this section.
SECTION 4. Appropriation. – Effective July 1, 2026, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for implementation of this act. These funds are
not subject to the provisions of G.S. 143C-1-2(b).
SECTION 5. Effective Date. – Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes
effective January 1, 2028, and applies to work performed on or after that date.
House Bill 1045-First Edition Page 3